Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5254
Small employer carrier, defined.

Small employer carrier shall mean a carrier that offers health benefit plans covering eligible employees of one or more small employers in this state.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 32.